Hawaii, session 2025, HB137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 134-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (j) to read as follows: "(j)  Any person violating subsection (a) or (b) shall be guilty of a class C felony; provided that any felon violating subsection (b) shall be guilty of a class B felony[.] and if said prior felony conviction is that of a crime of violence, as defined in section 134-1, the defendant shall be sentenced to an indeterminate term of imprisonment as provided by law.  Any person violating subsection (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval.